Massachusetts, session 194th, H2478.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 53H the following section:- 
Section 53I. (a) A clinic or physician practice registered under section 4A of chapter 112, 
hereinafter referred to as registered physician practice, shall notify the department not less than 
180 days prior to any sale, relocation or closure. The department may conduct a public hearing 
on the proposed sale, relocation or closure not less than 90 days prior to the proposed date of 
such event. The hearing shall consider the potential impacts of the proposed transaction, 
including, but not limited to: 
(i) the potential loss or change in access to services for the population served by the clinic 
or registered physician practice in the 24 months immediately preceding the notice to sell, 
relocate or close; 

of 4 12  (ii) alternative providers and locations where the population served by the clinic or 
registered physician practice will be able to obtain the health care services that were provided by 
the clinic or registered physician practice during the 24 months following the sale, relocation or 
closure; and 
(iii) options available to the department to mitigate the impact of the sale, relocation or 
closure on patients. 
(b) Any clinic or registered physician practice that intends to sell, relocate or close shall 
notify their patients in writing not less than 90 days prior to the date of such sale, relocation or 
closure. The written notice shall be sent in a manner prescribed by the department and shall 
notify the patient that the clinic or registered physician practice shall continue to provide services 
to the patient for 90 days. Such notice shall also offer the patient resources to assist in finding a 
substitute health care provider and include the name and contact information for the entity 
assuming responsibility for the management of the patient’s medical records. 
SECTION 2. Said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 4 the 
following section:- 
Section 4A. (a) The board shall establish and maintain a registry of all physician practices 
of greater than 10 physicians engaged in a wholly-owned and controlled group practice; 
provided, however, that a provider organization registered pursuant to section 11 of chapter 6D 
shall not be required to register under this section. Any person seeking to maintain a physician 
practice shall file with the board a registration application containing such information as the 
board may reasonably require including, but not limited to: (i) the identity of the applicant and of 
the physicians which constitute the practice; (ii) the identity of any substantial equity investor, as 

of 4 34 defined in section 1 of said chapter 6D, of the practice; (iii) any management services 
organization, as defined in said section 1 of said chapter 6D, under contract with the practice; 
and (iv) a certified copy of the physician practice’s certificate of organization, if any, as filed 
with the secretary of the commonwealth, or any applicable partnership agreement. The 
application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount to be determined pursuant to section 3B 
of chapter 7. All physician practices registered in the commonwealth shall renew their 
certificates of registration with the board every 2 years.   
SECTION 3. Said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5O 
the following section:- 
Section 5P. (a) Any physician licensed by the board who intends to terminate a bona fide 
physician-patient relationship where the physician has a role in the ongoing care and treatment of 
the patient, shall notify the patient in writing not less than 90 days prior to the date of such 
termination in a manner prescribed through guidance established by the board. The requirements 
of this section may be satisfied through notice otherwise consistent with the requirements of this 
section delivered by the physician’s employing entity, including, but not limited to, a physician 
practice registered pursuant to section 4A.  
(b) The notice required under this section shall also offer the patient resources to assist in 
finding a substitute health care provider and include the name and contact information for the 
entity assuming responsibility for the management of the patient’s medical records. Any 
physician who terminates a physician-patient relationship without providing notice to a patient as 
provided for in this section shall be subject to discipline by the board of registration in medicine.   

of 4 55  SECTION 4. All physician practices required to register pursuant to section 4A of 
chapter 112 of the General Laws, as inserted by section 129, shall register with the board of 
registration in medicine not later than October 1, 2026.